District of Columbia statutes.
47-3151

Definitions.

For the purposes of this chapter, the term:

(1)

“Drawer” means an individual who makes or signs a check or other draft, but not including a credit or debit card sales draft.

(2)

“Sale” means any:

(A)

Offer, or attempt to sell merchandise, real property, or intangibles for cash or credit; or

(B)

Service or offer for service which relates to any person, building, or equipment.

(3)

“Service” means any:

(A)

Building repair or improvement service;

(B)

Subprofessional service;

(C)

Repair of a motor vehicle, home appliance, or other similar commodity; or

(D)

Repair, installation, or other servicing of any plumbing, heating, electrical, or mechanical device.

Mar. 11, 1992, D.C. Law 9-69, § 2, 39 DCR 16
enacted, Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-254, § 2, 44 DCR 1575
1981 Ed., § 47-3151.